Maine, session 132, LD1783.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 30-A MRSA §5248, sub-§2, ¶G, as amended by PL 2013, c. 312, §3, is
further amended to read:
G. The duration of the program, which may start starts and ends during any the tax
year years specified in the approval of the affordable housing development program by
a municipal legislative body, except that the program duration may not exceed the
earlier of 30 years after the tax year in which the affordable housing is placed in service,
as evidenced by issuance of a municipal certificate of occupancy, and 35 years after
the tax year in which the designation of the district is approved by the director as
provided in section 5250, subsection 3; and
Sec. 2. 30-A MRSA §5250-E, sub-§1, as enacted by PL 2003, c. 426, §1, is
amended to read:
1. Reports. The legislative body of a municipality must shall report annually to the
director regarding the status of an affordable housing development district. The legislative
body of the municipality may delegate the annual reporting requirement to a municipal
officer in the initial designation of the affordable housing development district. The report
must:
A. Certify that the public purpose of the affordable housing district, as outlined in this
subchapter, is being met;
B. Account for any sales of property within the district; and
C. Certify that rental units within the affordable housing development district have
remained affordable.
Page 1 - 132LR1418(03)